Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2424
Projects other than power projects; certificate of incorporation; proof of agency's establishment.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of the agency, the agency shall be conclusively deemed to have been established, except as against the state, in accordance with sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 upon proof of the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the Secretary of State, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action, or proceeding and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents thereof.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 24.